Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 5. Discharge of Hospital Patients.

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 47, SLA 2016 made this article effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 18.20.500.
Aftercare assessment and designation of caregiver.

Before discharging a patient, a hospital shall assess the patient’s ability for self-care after discharge and provide the patient with the opportunity to designate a caregiver who agrees to provide aftercare for the patient in a private residence after discharge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2016)

Sec. 18.20.510.
Planning, instruction, and training.

A hospital shall give the patient and the patient’s designated caregiver the opportunity to participate in planning for the patient’s discharge from the hospital.

Before discharge, a hospital shall provide a patient and the patient’s designated caregiver with instruction and training as necessary for the designated caregiver to perform medical and nursing aftercare following discharge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2016)

Sec. 18.20.520.
Notification of discharge.

A hospital shall notify a patient’s designated caregiver of the patient’s discharge or transfer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2016)

Sec. 18.20.530.
Discharge policies.

A hospital shall adopt and maintain written discharge policies. The policies must comply with AS

18.20.500

—

18.20.590

.

The discharge policies of a hospital must specify the requirements for documenting the identity of a patient’s designated caregiver and the details of the discharge plan for the patient, including professional follow-up as specified in the discharge plan.

The discharge policies of a hospital may incorporate established evidence-based practices that include

standards for accreditation adopted by a nationally recognized hospital accreditation organization; or

the conditions of participation for hospitals adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

The discharge policies of a hospital must ensure that the discharge planning is appropriate to the condition of the patient, and the hospital shall interpret the discharge policies in a manner and as necessary to meet the needs and condition of the patient and the abilities of the patient’s designated caregiver.

AS

18.20.500

—

18.20.590

do not require that a hospital adopt discharge policies that would

delay a patient’s discharge or transfer to another facility; or

require the disclosure of protected health information without obtaining a patient’s consent as required by state and federal laws governing health information privacy and security.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2016)

Sec. 18.20.540.
Construction of provisions.

The provisions of AS

18.20.500

—

18.20.590

may not be construed to

create a right of action against a hospital, a hospital employee, or a contractor of the hospital, including a person who contracts with the hospital to provide instruction to a designated caregiver, based on an action performed or not performed under AS

18.20.500

—

18.20.590

; or

replace, change, or otherwise affect rights or remedies that are provided under another provision of law, including common law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2016)

Sec. 18.20.550.
Coordination with other authority.

AS

18.20.500

—

18.20.590

may not be interpreted to interfere with the powers or duties of

an agent operating under a valid advance health care directive under AS 13.52; or

a legal guardian of the patient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2016)

Sec. 18.20.590.
Definitions.

In AS

18.20.500

—

18.20.590

,

“aftercare” includes

assistance with the activities of daily living or activities that are instrumental to the activities of daily living;

wound care, medication administration, medical equipment operation, mobility assistance, and other medical or nursing tasks; and

other assistance related to the patient’s condition at the time of discharge;

“designated caregiver” means a caregiver designated by the patient who agrees to provide aftercare to the patient in a private residence;

“discharge” means a patient’s release from a hospital following the patient’s admission to the hospital;

“hospital” has the meaning given in AS

18.20.130

, but does not include a hospital that is limited to the treatment of mental disorders;

“private residence” does not include a rehabilitative facility, a hospital, a nursing home, an assisted living facility, a group home, or another licensed health care facility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2016)